Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201279-1125.01
Support services,
defined.

Support services means preventive services
for those children from birth to age twenty-one years and, if the child's
twenty-first birthday occurs during the school year, until the end of that
school year, not identified or verified as children with disabilities pursuant
to sections 79-1118.01, 79-1138, and 79-1139 but demonstrating
a need for specially designed assistance in order to benefit from the school
district's general education curriculum and to avoid the need for potentially
expensive special education placement and services. Support services include the educational services provided
to a child pursuant to subdivision (10)(c) of section 79-215 by an interim-program
school or an approved or accredited school maintained by a residential setting
if such child has not been identified or verified as a child with a disability
pursuant to sections 79-1118.01 and 79-1138 but demonstrates a need for specially
designed assistance by residing in a residential setting described in subdivision
(10)(a) of section 79-215.

Laws 1995, LB 742, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-348;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 867;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 49;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 49;

R.S.Supp.,1998, § 79-1185;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 51;

Laws 2000, LB 1243, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB1087, § 6.